Delaware, session 153, SB210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 1001, Chapter 10, Title 26 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1001. Definitions. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: (5) âCommunity-owned energy generating facilityâ means a renewable energy generating facility, where the point of interconnection is located in the service area of a utility under the regulation of the Public Service Commission, that has multiple owners or customers who share the output of the generator, which may be located either as a stand-alone facility or behind the meter of a participating owner or customer. The facility shall be interconnected to the distribution system and operated in parallel with an electric distribution companyâs transmission and distribution facilities.